Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 6. Cigarette Tax Stamps.

Sec. 43.50.500.
Tax payment by use of stamps.

A licensee shall pay the tax imposed under AS

43.50.090(a)

,

43.50.190(a)

, and

43.50.200

through the use of stamps issued under AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.700

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 22 ch 1 FSSLA 2004)

Sec. 43.50.510.
Stamp design; manner of affixing.

The department shall design and furnish stamps of sizes and denominations as determined by the department.

Notwithstanding the packaging requirements of AS

43.70.075(g)(1)

, a stamp required under AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.700

must be affixed

on the smallest package that will be handled, sold, used, consumed, or distributed in this state; and

in a denomination equal to the amount of tax due under this chapter on the cigarettes in the package.

A stamp required under AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.700

shall be affixed to the bottom of each individual package of cigarettes in a manner so that the stamp cannot be removed from the package without being mutilated or destroyed.

For purposes of this section, a stamp is considered affixed only if more than 80 percent of the stamp is attached to the individual package in accordance with (c) of this section and regulations adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.50.520.
Stamp required before sale, distribution, or consumption.

Except as provided in AS

43.50.580

, a licensee or the authorized agent or designee of the licensee shall affix a stamp, in the manner required by AS

43.50.510

, to each package of cigarettes immediately upon the opening of the shipping container containing the package and before sale, distribution, or consumption in this state.

Except as provided in AS

43.50.580

and

43.50.610

, a person may not engage in the following activities in this state unless the package containing the cigarettes is affixed with the required stamp:

sell or distribute cigarettes to a person who is a consumer in this state;

acquire, hold, own, possess, or transport cigarettes for sale or distribution in this state;

import or cause to be imported cigarettes into this state for sale, distribution, or consumption; or

place or store cigarette packages in a vending machine in this state.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.50.530.
Sale of stamps.

The department shall furnish stamps for sale to licensees.

The department may enter into agreements with financial institutions to permit the sale of stamps by those institutions. The department shall make a list of financial institutions authorized to sell stamps under this section available to the public.

The department may limit the number of stamps sold to a licensee during the three months immediately preceding the effective date of a tax increase under AS

43.50.090

,

43.50.190

, or

43.50.200

to minimize the amount of cigarette stockpiling by a licensee. The department may not set the limit of stamps that a licensee may purchase during that three-month period below an amount equal to three times the average monthly stamp purchases made by the licensee during the 12-month period immediately preceding that three-month period.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 23 ch 1 FSSLA 2004)

Sec. 43.50.540.
Purchase of and payment for stamps.

A licensee shall apply to the department or a financial institution authorized under AS

43.50.530(b)

to purchase stamps required by AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.700

.

A licensee may authorize an agent or designee to purchase stamps for the licensee at a location where stamps are sold. The licensee’s authorization of an agent or designee must be in writing and must be signed by the licensee. The licensee shall provide a copy of the authorization to the department. The authorization continues in effect until the department receives the licensee’s written notice of revocation of the authorization.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, each stamp shall be sold to a licensee at its denominated value less the discount provided in this subsection. The discount under this subsection is provided as compensation for affixing stamps to packages as required by AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.700

. The department may reduce or eliminate the discount to a licensee under this subsection if the licensee fails to meet the requirements of AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.700

. The discount under this subsection is equal to the sum of the amounts calculated using the following percentages of denominated value of stamps purchased by a licensee under this section in a calendar year:

$1,000,000 or less, three percent;

the amount that is more than $1,000,000 but not more than $2,000,000, two percent;

the amount that is over $2,000,000, zero percent.

Payment for stamps shall be made at the time of purchase, except that the department may permit a licensee to defer payments as provided in AS

43.50.550

.

The licensee or the licensee’s agent or designee must obtain the stamps in person from the department or a financial institution authorized to sell stamps under AS

43.50.530(b)

. Alternatively, the licensee may request in writing that the stamps be shipped or transported in a manner specified by the licensee that is acceptable to the department. The department may accept only United States mail or common or private carrier as a shipping or transportation method.

Title to the stamps passes immediately to the licensee at the time the stamps are obtained in person or, if the stamps are shipped or transported, at the time the stamps are placed in the United States mail or received by the common or private carrier. The licensee bears all costs associated with shipping or transporting the stamps. The department may replace stamps lost or damaged in transit if the licensee provides proof acceptable to the department verifying that the loss or damage occurred while the stamps were in the possession of the shipping company and the shipping company substantiates the loss or damage. Damaged stamps must be returned to the department before the department may replace them.

Loss, destruction, or theft of stamps does not absolve the licensee of its obligation to make payment for the stamps, including payment on a deferred-payment basis under AS

43.50.550

.

For purposes of the discount provided in (c) of this section, “stamps purchased by a licensee” includes stamps purchased by affiliated licensees.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 24 ch 1 FSSLA 2004)

Sec. 43.50.550.
Deferred-payment basis for stamps.

A licensee may apply to the department to purchase stamps on a deferred-payment basis. Upon receipt of the application and the bond required under (b) of this section, the department may set the maximum dollar amount of stamps that the licensee is authorized to purchase on a deferred-payment basis in a calendar month.

A licensee who submits an application for the purchase of stamps on a deferred-payment basis shall, as a condition of approval of the application, post a bond acceptable to the department in an amount equal to

200 percent of the maximum dollar amount of allowed monthly purchases under this section; or

100 percent of the maximum dollar amount of allowed monthly purchases under this section if the licensee

holds a license issued under AS

43.50.010

for a physical location in this state; and

has been in full compliance with the provisions of this title and regulations adopted under this title during the preceding 60 months.

Amounts owing for stamps purchased on a deferred-payment basis in a calendar month are due on or before the last day of the next calendar month. Payment shall be made by a remittance acceptable to the department that is made payable to the department.

The department may designate the sales locations where the licensee may make purchases of stamps on a deferred-payment basis and fix the dollar amount of purchases that the licensee may make under this section at each designated sales location each month.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 25 ch 1 FSSLA 2004)

Sec. 43.50.560.
Suspension of deferred-payment basis privilege.

The department may suspend, without prior notice, a licensee’s privilege to purchase stamps on a deferred-payment basis or may reduce the monthly dollar amount of purchases the licensee may make under AS

43.50.550

if

the licensee fails to pay for stamps when payment is due;

the licensee’s bond is cancelled or becomes void, impaired, or unenforceable;

the department determines that the collection of an amount unpaid or due from the licensee under this chapter is jeopardized; or

the licensee violates a state statute or regulation related to the collection of taxes under this chapter.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.50.570.
Interest.

A licensee who fails to pay an amount due for the purchase of stamps within the time required

is considered to have failed to pay the cigarette taxes due under this chapter; and

shall pay interest at the rate established under AS

43.05.225

from the date on which the amount became due until the date of payment.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.50.580.
Possession of unstamped cigarettes.

Except as provided in (b) of this section and in AS

43.50.610

, a person may not possess unstamped cigarettes in this state.

A licensee may possess unstamped cigarettes in this state if

the licensee posts a surety bond in an amount satisfactory to the department to ensure performance of its duties under this chapter; and

unstamped cigarettes are necessary for the conduct of the licensee’s business in making sales or distributions to

an instrumentality of the federal government or an Indian tribal organization authorized by law to possess cigarettes not taxed under this chapter; or

customers outside the state and the licensee provides proof acceptable to the department that the licensee is properly licensed in the jurisdictions outside the state where the sales or distributions are made.

At the time of shipping or delivering cigarettes to an instrumentality of the federal government or an Indian tribal organization authorized by law to possess cigarettes not taxed under this chapter, a licensee shall make a duplicate invoice showing complete details of the shipment or other distribution and a statement indicating whether stamps were affixed to each cigarette package in accordance with AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.700

. The licensee shall transmit the duplicate invoice to the department as an attachment to the monthly report required under AS

43.50.630

.

If a licensee who is authorized to possess unstamped cigarettes under (b) of this section fails to comply with the requirements of this section, the licensee is no longer authorized to and may not possess unstamped cigarettes under this section and is subject to the imposition of any applicable penalty under this title or other law.

For purposes of (a) of this section, “person” does not include entities to whom sales or distributions are made as described in (b)(2) of this section.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 26 ch 1 FSSLA 2004)

Sec. 43.50.590.
Refunds or credits for unused stamps and for unsalable, destroyed, or certain returned cigarette packages.

The department shall adopt procedures for a refund or credit to a licensee in the amount of the denominated value, less the discount given under AS

43.50.540

, for

unused or damaged stamps;

stamps affixed to cigarette packages that have become unfit for use or sale, are destroyed, or are returned to the manufacturer for credit or replacement if the licensee provides proof acceptable to the department that the cigarettes have not been and will not be consumed in this state; or

stamps affixed to cigarette packages that are sold or distributed outside the state if the licensee provides proof acceptable to the department that the cigarettes have not been and will not be consumed in this state and the licensee is properly licensed in the jurisdictions outside the state where the sales or distributions are made.

A refund or credit under (a) of this section may not be allowed for stamps affixed to cigarette packages in violation of this chapter or AS 45.53.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 27 ch 1 FSSLA 2004)

Sec. 43.50.600.
Stamps prohibited on cigarette packages not complying with federal and state laws.

A licensee or the licensee’s authorized agent or designee may not affix a stamp to a cigarette package if the cigarettes

may not be acquired, held, owned, imported, possessed, sold, or distributed in this state under AS

43.50.400

; or

are not in compliance with other state or federal laws.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.50.610.
Unstamped cigarettes as contraband; seizure.

Unstamped cigarettes found in this state are contraband and may be seized by the commissioner or an agent or employee of the commissioner or by any peace officer of the state, unless

the cigarettes are

in the possession of a licensee or are in transit from outside the state and are consigned to a licensee; and

in the original and unopened shipping container; or

possession of the unstamped cigarettes is not a violation of this chapter.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.50.620.
Forfeiture and destruction of seized cigarettes.

Cigarettes seized under AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.700

are forfeited to the state. After notice and an opportunity for a hearing, the commissioner shall destroy the cigarettes forfeited under this section.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.50.625.
Forfeiture of other property.

Upon a showing of probable cause that a person has committed the crime of misconduct involving unstamped cigarettes or stamps in the first degree under AS

43.50.640

, the following are subject to forfeiture:

material and equipment used in the manufacture, sale, offering for sale, or possession for sale of cigarettes in this state in violation of AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.640

or

43.50.660

—

43.50.700

;

aircraft, vehicles, or vessels used to transport or facilitate the transportation of cigarettes manufactured, sold, offered for sale, or possessed for sale in this state in violation of AS

43.50.500

— 43.50.640 or

43.50.660

—

43.50.700

;

money, securities, negotiable instruments, or other things of value used in financial transactions derived from activity prohibited under AS 43.50.500 — 43.50.640 or 43.50.660 — 43.50.700.

Property subject to forfeiture under this section may be actually or constructively seized under an order issued by the superior court upon a showing of probable cause that the property is subject to forfeiture under this section. Constructive seizure is effected upon posting a signed notice of seizure on the item to be forfeited, stating the violation and the date and place of seizure. Seizure without a court order may be made if

the seizure is incident to a valid arrest or search;

the property subject to seizure is the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state; or

there is probable cause to believe that the property is subject to forfeiture under (a) of this section; property seized under this paragraph may be held for not more than 48 hours unless an order of forfeiture is issued by the court before the end of that time period.

Within 30 days after a seizure under this section, the Department of Public Safety shall make reasonable efforts to ascertain the identity and whereabouts of any person holding an interest, or an assignee of a person holding an interest, in the property seized, including a right to possession, or a lien, mortgage, or conditional sales contract. The Department of Public Safety shall notify the person ascertained to have an interest in the seized property of the impending forfeiture, and, before forfeiture, the Department of Public Safety shall publish, once a week for four consecutive calendar weeks, a notice of the impending forfeiture in a newspaper of general circulation in the judicial district in which the seizure was made, or if a newspaper is not published in that judicial district, in a newspaper published in the state and distributed in that judicial district.

Property subject to forfeiture under (a) of this section may be forfeited

upon conviction of a person for a violation of AS

43.50.640

; or

upon judgment by the superior court in a proceeding in rem that the property was used in a manner subjecting it to forfeiture under (a) of this section.

The owner of property subject to forfeiture under (a) of this section is entitled to relief from the forfeiture in the nature of remission of the forfeiture if, in an action under (d) of this section, the owner shows that the owner

was not a party to the violation;

did not have actual knowledge or reasonable cause to believe that the property was used or was to be used in violation of the law; and

did not have actual knowledge or reasonable cause to believe that the person committing the violation had, within the last 10 years,

a criminal record for violating this chapter; or

committed other violations of this chapter.

The court may allow the owner of property that is subject to forfeiture under (a) of this section to redeem the property by paying an amount determined by the court to be the fair market value of the property.

A person other than the owner holding, or the assignee of, a lien, mortgage, or conditional sales contract on, or the right to possession of, property subject to forfeiture under (a) of this section is entitled to relief from the forfeiture in the nature of remission of the forfeiture if, in an action under (d) of this section, the person shows that the person

was not a party to the violation subjecting the property to forfeiture;

did not have actual knowledge or reasonable cause to believe that the property was used or was to be used in violation of the law; and

did not have actual knowledge or reasonable cause to believe that the person committing the violation had, within the last 10 years,

a criminal record for violating this chapter; or

committed other violations of this chapter.

It is not a defense in an in rem forfeiture proceeding brought under (d)(2) of this section that a criminal proceeding is pending or has resulted in conviction or acquittal of a person charged with violating AS

43.50.640

.

Property forfeited under this section shall be placed in the custody of the commissioner of public safety for disposition according to an order entered by the court. The court shall order destroyed any property forfeited under this section that is harmful to the public and may order any property forfeited under this section that was seized in a municipality to be transferred to the municipality in which the property was seized or to another municipality affected by the crime for which the property was forfeited. The state shall notify all municipalities affected by the crime of the forfeiture proceeding. Other property shall be ordered sold and the proceeds used for payment of expenses of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, custody, and court costs. The remainder of the proceeds shall be deposited in the general fund.

The title to a vehicle or vessel forfeited to the state under this section may be transferred by the state to a municipality or the local governing body of a village for official use by the municipality or village, on condition that the vehicle or vessel not be available for use by the defendant.

History.

(§ 28 ch 1 FSSLA 2004)

Sec. 43.50.630.
Monthly reports; records retention; inspection of records.

On or before the last day of each calendar month, a licensee shall file the following information for each place of business with the department, on a form or in a format prescribed by the department:

the quantity and brands of cigarettes manufactured, imported, acquired, or sold in the state during the preceding calendar month;

the number and dollar amount of stamps

purchased during the preceding calendar month;

affixed to cigarette packages during the preceding calendar month;

not affixed to cigarette packages and on hand at the end of the preceding calendar month; and

refunded or credited to a licensee under AS

43.50.590

; and

any other information that the department requires to carry out its duties under this chapter.

If a licensee ceases to manufacture, import, acquire, or sell cigarettes in this state, the licensee shall immediately file the form required under (a) of this section with the department, for the period ending with the cessation.

All statements and other records required by AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.700

must be

in a form or format prescribed by the department;

preserved by a licensee for a period of three years; and

available for inspection at any time upon oral or written demand by the department or its authorized agent.

A summary of information filed under (a) of this section shall be prepared by the department and released to the public upon request.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.50.640.
Misconduct involving unstamped cigarettes or stamps in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of misconduct involving unstamped cigarettes or stamps in the first degree if the person

with reckless disregard that the cigarettes are unstamped

sells or distributes 5,000 or more unstamped cigarettes in a single transaction;

owns or possesses 5,000 or more unstamped cigarettes with the intent to sell; or

acquires, holds, transports, imports, or possesses 10,000 or more unstamped cigarettes; or

with reckless disregard that the stamp was previously affixed to another cigarette package

affixes a previously used stamp to a cigarette package; or

possesses, sells, or distributes a previously used stamp.

Misconduct involving unstamped cigarettes or stamps in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 29 ch 1 FSSLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For punishment for class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 43.50.650.
Misconduct involving unstamped cigarettes or stamps in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of misconduct involving unstamped cigarettes or stamps in the second degree if the person

with reckless disregard that the cigarettes are unstamped

sells or distributes at least one but fewer than 5,000 unstamped cigarettes in a single transaction;

owns or possesses at least one but fewer than 5,000 unstamped cigarettes, with intent to sell;

acquires, holds, transports, imports, or possesses at least 601 but fewer than 10,000 unstamped cigarettes; or

acquires, holds, transports, imports, or possesses at least one but fewer than 601 unstamped cigarettes that are not for personal consumption; or

is not licensed under this chapter or otherwise authorized by the department to possess stamps and possesses a stamp that is not affixed to a cigarette package.

Misconduct involving unstamped cigarettes or stamps in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 30 ch 1 FSSLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 43.50.660.
Construction of criminal statutes.

The provisions of AS 11.16, AS

11.81.600

,

11.81.610

, and

11.81.900

apply to AS

43.50.640

and

43.50.650

.

For purposes of AS

43.50.640

and

43.50.650

, display of cigarettes by a person, or possession other than in the original and unopened shipping container of cigarettes by a person who holds a business license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

, is prima facie evidence of possession with intent to sell cigarettes. In this subsection, “display” means to openly exhibit.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.50.670.
Unauthorized transfer of unaffixed stamps.

A licensee may not sell, exchange, or otherwise transfer stamps not affixed to a package of cigarettes in accordance with this chapter to another person without the prior written approval of the department.

After notice and opportunity for a hearing, the department may assess a civil fine of not less than $1,000 nor more than $10,000 for a violation of (a) of this section. The fine assessed is in addition to any other penalty available under the law.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.50.700.
Definitions.

In AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.700

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“affiliated licensees” means two or more licensees in which the same person holds, directly or indirectly, at least a 50 percent ownership interest;

“carton” means a box or container originating from the manufacturer that contains packages of that manufacturer’s cigarettes;

“cigarette” has the meaning given in AS

43.50.170

;

“licensee” means a person licensed by the department under AS

43.50.010

or

43.50.035

to sell, distribute, purchase, possess, or acquire cigarettes;

“package” means the individual packet, box, or other container, originating from the manufacturer, in which retail sales of cigarettes are normally made or intended to be made; “package” does not include containers that are cartons, cases, bales, or boxes that contain packages of cigarettes;

“person” has the meaning given in AS

43.50.170

;

“shipping container” means the case, box, parcel, or other container in which cartons or packages of cigarettes are placed for shipment or transportation from one place to another; “shipping container” does not include a package in which retail sales of cigarettes are normally made or intended to be made;

“stamp” means a stamp or other indicium that is

printed, manufactured, or made under authorization of the department under this chapter;

issued, sold, or circulated by the department; and

used to pay the cigarette taxes levied under this chapter;

“unstamped cigarettes” means a package containing cigarettes that is not affixed with the stamp required by AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.700

or is affixed with a stamp in a denomination less than the tax levied under this chapter.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 31 ch 1 FSSLA 2004)